Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.12.110

Shareholders—Actions authorized without meetings—Written consent.

(1) Any action required by this title to be taken at a meeting of the shareholders of a state trust company, or any action that may be taken at a meeting of such shareholders, may be taken without a meeting if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so taken, is signed by all of the shareholders entitled to vote with respect to the subject matter thereof.

(2) The consent has the same force and effect as a unanimous vote of shareholders and may be stated as such in any articles or documents filed under this title.

[ 2014 c 37 s 357.]